Hawaii statutes.
§46-16.8 County surcharge on state tax.
[Section repealed December 31, 2027. L 2015, c 240, §7.] (a)
Each county may establish a surcharge on state tax at the rates enumerated in
sections 237-8.6 and 238-2.6. A county electing to establish this surcharge
shall do so by ordinance; provided that:

(1) No ordinance shall be adopted until the county
has conducted a public hearing on the proposed ordinance;

(2) The ordinance shall be adopted prior to December
31, 2005; and

(3) No county surcharge on state tax that may be
authorized under this subsection shall be levied prior to January 1, 2007, or
after December 31, 2022, unless extended pursuant to subsection (b).

Notice of the public hearing required under
paragraph (1) shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation within
the county at least twice within a period of thirty days immediately preceding
the date of the hearing.

A county electing to exercise the authority
granted under this subsection shall notify the director of taxation within ten
days after the county has adopted a surcharge on state tax ordinance and,
beginning no earlier than January 1, 2007, the director of taxation shall levy,
assess, collect, and otherwise administer the county surcharge on state tax.

(b) Each county that has established a
surcharge on state tax prior to [July 1, 2015,] under authority of subsection
(a) may extend the surcharge from January 1, 2023, until December 31, 2027, at
the same rates. A county electing to extend this surcharge shall do so by ordinance;
provided that:

(1) No ordinance shall be adopted until the county
has conducted a public hearing on the proposed ordinance; and

(2) The ordinance shall be adopted prior to July 1,
2016, but no earlier than July 1, 2015.

A county electing to exercise the authority
granted under this subsection shall notify the director of taxation within ten
days after the county has adopted an ordinance extending the surcharge on state
tax. Beginning on January 1, 2023, the director of taxation shall levy, assess,
collect, and otherwise administer the extended surcharge on state tax.

(c) Each county that has not established a
surcharge on state tax prior to [July 1, 2015,] may establish the surcharge at
the rates enumerated in sections 237-8.6 and 238-2.6. A county electing to
establish this surcharge shall do so by ordinance; provided that:

(1) No ordinance shall be adopted until the county
has conducted a public hearing on the proposed ordinance;

(2) The ordinance shall be adopted prior to July 1,
2016, but no earlier than July 1, 2015; and

(3) No county surcharge on state tax that may be
authorized under this subsection shall be levied prior to January 1, 2018, or
after December 31, 2027.

A county electing to exercise the authority
granted under this subsection shall notify the director of taxation within ten
days after the county has adopted a surcharge on state tax ordinance.
Beginning on January 1, 2018, the director of taxation shall levy, assess,
collect, and otherwise administer the county surcharge on state tax.

(d) Notice of the public hearing required
under subsection (b) or (c) before adoption of an ordinance establishing or
extending the surcharge on state tax shall be published in a newspaper of
general circulation within the county at least twice within a period of thirty
days immediately preceding the date of the hearing.

(e) Each county with a population greater than
five hundred thousand that adopts or extends a county surcharge on state tax
ordinance pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) shall use the surcharges received
from the State for:

(1) Capital costs of a locally preferred alternative
for a mass transit project; and

(2) Expenses in complying with the Americans with
Disabilities Act of 1990 with respect to paragraph (1).

The county surcharge on state tax shall not be used
to build or repair public roads or highways, bicycle paths, or support public
transportation systems already in existence prior to July 12, 2005.

(f) Each county with a population equal to or
less than five hundred thousand that adopts a county surcharge on state tax
ordinance pursuant to this section shall use the surcharges received from the
State for:

(1) Operating or capital costs of public
transportation within each county for public transportation systems, including
public roadways or highways, public buses, trains, ferries, pedestrian paths or
sidewalks, or bicycle paths; and

(2) Expenses in complying with the Americans with
Disabilities Act of 1990 with respect to paragraph (1).

(g) As used in this section, "capital
costs" means nonrecurring costs required to construct a transit facility
or system, including debt service, costs of land acquisition and development,
acquiring of rights-of-way, planning, design, and construction, and including
equipping and furnishing the facility or system. For a county with a
population greater than five hundred thousand, capital costs also include
non-recurring personal services and other overhead costs that are not intended
to continue after completion of construction of the minimum operable segment of
the locally preferred alternative for a mass transit project. [L 2005, c 247, §§2,
9; am L 2015, c 240, §3]

Revision Note

"July 12, 2005" substituted for "the effective
date of this Act".

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next